old/hyphen/dkspecial.tex
%% dkspecial.tex
%% Copyright 1994 Frank Jensen (Frank.Jensen@hugin.com)
%
% This work may be distributed and/or modified under the
% conditions of the LaTeX Project Public License, either version 1.3
% of this license or (at your option) any later version.
% The latest version of this license is in
%   http://www.latex-project.org/lppl.txt
% and version 1.3 or later is part of all distributions of LaTeX
% version 2003/12/01 or later.
%
% This work consists of the files dkcommon.tex, dkhyphen.tex and 
% dkspecial.tex.
\patterns{ % just type <return> if you're not using INITEX
.sZ3
.Xr5i
.Yv3r
a3tY
a5vX
brYd3
5bX
5drYv
dstZ4
3dX
3dY
e3lX
e3lY
e3rY
er5Yn
e5tX
e5tY
e1vX
e3X
e5Z
3fX
3fY
fY4r5en
giY4
g4sY
g5sZ
3gX
3gY1
3gZ
i5tX
i3Y
3kY
3kZ
lingeniY4
l3vX
5lYs
m5tZ
1mX
3mY
3mZ
n3kX
n5tX
3nX
4n5Xb
5nY
o5lX
or3Y
o5Z
5prX
5pXd
pZ3
r5kX
r5tX
r5tY
r3vX
r5Xl
4rYn
5rYr
3rZd
r5Zr
s4kZ
3slZ
s4nX
5stY
1stZ
1sX
4s5Xn
1sY
s5Yk
sZ4r5
ti4Y
3trXk.
t4sY
t5sZ
t3vX
u3lX
3vXrd
1vXrk
5vZ
y5vX
Xb3l
X3c
X3e
Xg5a
X4gek
X4g5r
Xgs5
X5i
X5kv
Xlle4
Xn1dr
X5o
X1re
Xr4g5r
X3ri
Xr4ma
Xr4mo
Xr5s
X5si
X3so
X3ste
X3ve
Yde5
Y3e
Y1je
Y3ke
Y3le
Yms5
Yn3st
Yn4t3
Y1re
Y3ri
Yrne3
Yr5o
Y1ve
Z1d
Z1e
Z5h
Z3l
Z3re
Zrs5t
Z5sk
Z3t
}
\endinput
